Ohio, session 136, SB406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.63. The twenty-seventh day of August is designated as "Lyndon B. Johnson Day" in recognition of President Lyndon B. Johnson, who was born on that day in 1908.